Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF ST. CLOUD; COOPER AVENUE REDEVELOPMENT TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT; FIVE-YEAR RULE EXTENSION.new text end new text begin The following special rules apply for the Cooper Avenue Redevelopment Tax Increment Financing District administered by the city of St. Cloud: new text end new text begin (1) the requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 3, that activities must be undertaken within a five-year period from the date of certification of a tax increment financing district, is extended by a five-year period to April 30, 2031; and new text end new text begin (2) the requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 6, that demolition, rehabilitation, or renovation of property or other site preparation must be undertaken within a four-year period from the date of certification of a tax increment financing district, is extended by a four-year period to April 30, 2030. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of St. Cloud and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end